src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs !!= @CODE@
gíng% is:gíng% íij CLASS-IS-STEM-2 "for S to make C stay in location [said of a person or animal]" ;
gíng% is:gíng% ij CLASS-IS-STEM-3 "for S to make C stay in location [said of a person or animal]" ;
kíl% is:kíl% íij CLASS-IS-STEM-2 "for S to tell C to stay in location" ;
kíl% is:kíl% ij CLASS-IS-STEM-3 "for S to tell C to stay in location" ;
xándiis:xándiíij CLASS-IS-STEM-2 "for S to beat C at a ball game, to defeat C in a ball game" ;
xándiis:xándiij CLASS-IS-STEM-3 "for S to beat C at a ball game, to defeat C in a ball game" ;
